South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3312.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-10-225 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (D) A motor vehicle may not be confiscated or seized based on a charge of failing to maintain proof of insurance in the motor vehicle in violation of this section. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----